hyphenation/cu-hyph-final.tex
\patterns{
.б2
.ба́1
.бе1с
.би2
.би́1
.биш1
.бле1
.бро1
.брѧ1
.бѧ́1
.в2
.ва̑1
.ва1в
.ва1л
.ва1н
.ва1х
.вдо1
.ве1д
.ве1н
.ви́1
.ви̑1
.вис1
.ви1т
.вле1
.вн2
.вое1
.врї1
.врї1
.вче1
.вї1
.вї1
.вїа1
.вїа1
.вѣ1р
.вѣ1т
.вꙋ1
.г2
.ге1л
.глꙋ1
.грѧ1
.гї1
.гї1
.гꙋ1б
.д2
.да1в
.да1л
.ди1м
.дол1
.др2
.дро1
.ды1х
.дї1
.дї1
.дѡ1р
.дѣ1в
.дѣ1л
.дꙋ1х
.ж2
.же1н
.же1с
.жи1л
.жи1т
.жє1н
.з2
.за1н
.за1х
.зер1
.зо1
.зꙋ1
.и1м
.к2
.ка̑1
.ки2
.кл2
.кое1
.ко1м
.кѡн1
.л2
.ла1в
.ли̑1
.ль2
.лю́1
.лї1
.лї1
.лѷ1
.лѷ1
.м2
.мам1
.ма1н
.ма1т
.ме1н
.мер1
.ме1т
.мле1
.мо1н
.мор1
.мо1щ
.мы̑1
.мѧ1т
.н2
.на1м
.на1х
.не1
.неѡ1
.ни1в
.ни1к
.ны́1
.ню2
.ню́1
.нї1
.нї1
.нѡ́1
.нѣ1м
.нѧ́1
.нꙋ2
.п2
.па1д
.па1с
.пе1л
.пер1
.пе1т
.пе1ц
.пи1т
.пї1
.пї1
.пѣв1
.р2
.рас1
.ра1х
.ри2
.роз1
.рѡ1м
.рѡс1
.рѣ̑1
.рꙋ̑1
.с2
.сен1
.слѧ1
.сма1
.смо1
.сн2
.со1з
.спо1
.ст2
.сты1
.стѡ1
.сє1
.сї1
.сї1
.сѣ̑1
.сѣн1
.сѧ́1
.т2
.та̑1
.те1ц
.ти1м
.тл2
.то1м
.тор1
.трї1
.трї1
.трѧ1
.ты́1
.ть2
.тї1
.тї1
.тѵ́1
.тѷ2
.тѷ2
.ф2
.фо2
.фор1
.фї1
.фї1
.фѡ́1
.х2
.хал1
.хе1
.хѡ1
.ц2
.ч2
.че1т
.чє́1
.ш2
.ша1
.шє́1
.щꙋ1
.ѕ2
.ѡ1б
.ѡби1
.ѡ1с
.ѯе́1
.ѳ2
.ѳї1
.ѳї1
.ѻ1б
.ѽ1
.ѿ1
2̀
̀1б
̀1ж
̀1ми1
̀2х
2́
́1а
́ба1
́бе1с
́б1лю1
́1блѧ1
́б1н
́бно1
́б2р
́бро1
́брѧ1
́брꙋ1
́б1ц
́б1ч
́бща1
́бы1
́бѣ1
́бꙋ1
́1ва
́вае1
́ва1с
́в1в
́вдо1
́1ве
́вед1
́1ви
́ви1ч
́влю1
́в1лє
́2в1н
́вне1
́внѧ1
́внꙋ1
́1во
́в1с
́в1ца
́2в1ч
́вше1
́1вы
́1вє
́1вї
́1вї
́1вѡ
́1вѣ
́1вѧ
́1вꙋ1
́1га
́2гг
́1ги
́1г2к
́г1ло
́гни1
́г1нꙋ
́1го
́гра1
́1да
́1д2в
́1де
́ди1в
́1д2к
́2дм
́2д1н2
́дно1
́1до
́д2р
́1дра1
́1дре
́д1с
́2д1ц
́1ды2
́1дї
́1дї
́дѡ1в
́1дꙋ
́1е
́еж2
́ема1
́емо1
́емꙋ1
́е2с
́ете1
́ет1н
́е2х
́1же
́2ж1н
́жнꙋ1
́1жє1
́1жꙋ
́зво1
́з1вѣ
́зд2
́1зда
́з1др
́1зе
́зе1р
́1зи
́2зл
́з1на1
́зни1
́з1но1
́з1нꙋ
́з1ра
́1зри
́1зрѧ
́1зы
́1зѣ
́1зѧ
́1з2ꙋ
́1и
́и1в
́ил2
́иче1
́иша1
́2й1
́2й1
́1ка
́1ки
́1клї
́1клї
́кни1
́1ко
́1кр
́кры1
́крꙋ1
́2кх
́1кї
́1кї
́1кѡ
́1кꙋ1
́1ла
́ла1с
́л2д
́1ле
́1ли
́ли1н
́1ло
́л2х
́1лы
́1лю
́1лє
́лє1м
́1лї
́1лї
́1лѡ
́1лѣ
́1лѧ
́1лꙋ
́1ма
́1ме
́1ми1
́м1ли
́м1лѧ
́2м1н
́мна1
́мно1
́мнꙋ1
́1мо
́2м1п
́2мт
́1мы
́1мє
́1мї
́1мї
́мѡ1щ
́1мѣ
́1мѧ
́1на
́1не
́1ни
́н1к
́нми1
́ннї1
́ннї1
́1но
́н1ц
́н1ч
́1ны
́1ню
́1нѣ
́1нѧ
́1нꙋ
́нꙋи1
́1о
́ово1
́о2м
́1па
́1пе
́1пи2
́п2л
́пла1
́1пле
́пло1
́1плю
́1плѧ1
́2п1н
́1по
́1пр
́п1с
́п1ш
́1пы
́1пѡ1
́1пѣ1
́1пꙋ
́1ра
́р1ве
́рда1
́рди1
́р1дї
́р1дї
́1ре
́ре1д
́1ри
́рма1
́рна1
́рне1
́1ро
́р1р
́рта1
́2р1ц
́рша1
́рше1
́1ры
́1рю
́1рє1
́1рї
́1рї
́1рѡ
́1рѣ2
́1рѧ
́1рѷ2
́1рѷ2
́1рꙋ
́рꙋю1
́1са
́сав1
́1се
́1си
́сли1
́сло1
́слѣ1
́смо1
́с1на1
́сни1
́с1но
́с1нꙋ
́1со
́1спе
́спо1
́с1пѧ
́с1са
́стꙋ1
́с1цы
́2с1ч
́с1ш
́сше1
́1сы
́1сѣ
́1та
́таи1
́тво1
́1твє
́1твѣ
́1те
́1ти
́ти1м
́2т1л
́тла1
́тли1
́т1н
́тна1
́тне1
́тнꙋ1
́1то
́то1р
́1тре
́1три1
́1тро
́1тры
́1трѣ
́1трꙋ
́2т1ц
́тцы1
́1тча
́1ты
́ть1
́1тє
́1тї
́1тї
́1тѡ
́1тѣ2
́1тѧ
́тѧ1н
́1тꙋ1
́1хи2
́1х2м
́1хо
́хї2
́хї2
́хꙋ1
́1ца
́1це1
́1цы1
́1цѣ2
́1цꙋ
́чат1
́че1в
́че1с
́ч1н
́2ч1т
́чє1
́чї1
́чї1
́1чꙋ1
́шне1
́шꙋ1
́1ща1
́щна1
́щно1
́1щє1
́щѧ1
́1ю
́1є
́1ї
́1ї
́їа1
́їа1
́їи1
́їи1
́ї2к
́ї2к
́ї1л
́ї1л
́1ѡ
́1ѣ
́1ѧ
́ѧв1
́ѧ1т
́ѧти1
́ѳ2
́1ѳе1
́ѳо2
́ѵи1
́ѵ2к
́ѵ2с
́1ѻ
́1ꙋ
2̑
̑1ва1
̑в1ни1
̑1внѣ
̑в1с
̑1вы
̑2гг
̑1ги
̑гꙋ2
̑гꙋб1
̑1да1
̑даю1
̑ди1
̑1д2к
̑2д1н
̑дни1
̑дны1
̑днї1
̑днї1
̑1до1
̑1др
̑1ды
̑1дї1
̑1дї1
̑дѣ2
̑дѣн1
̑1дꙋ1
̑2жд1
̑2ж1н
̑жны1
̑жї1
̑жї1
̑за2
̑зан1
̑з1на1
̑1зни
̑зны1
̑1зы
̑1и2
̑ин1
̑2й1
̑2й1
̑йши1
̑йши1
̑1ка1
̑1ки
̑2кл
̑1кї1
̑1кї1
̑1ла
̑1ли
̑лла1
̑1ло1
̑1лы1
̑1лї1
̑1лї1
̑1ма1
̑м1н
̑мны1
̑1мы1
̑1ни1
̑1ны
̑нї1
̑нї1
̑1нѧ
̑1па2
̑1пи1
̑пкї1
̑пкї1
̑1п2л
̑2п1н
̑пни1
̑пны1
̑пї1
̑пї1
̑1ра
̑1ри
̑рна1
̑р1с
̑1ры
̑1са
̑с2л
̑1см
̑с1на1
̑1сни
̑с1с
̑1та1
̑1тв
̑1ти
̑т1н
̑тна1
̑тны1
̑1ты1
̑1тї1
̑1тї1
̑2х
̑1ц
̑че1
̑чи1
̑ч1н
̑чна1
̑чї1
̑чї1
̑1щ
̑ща1
̑1ю1
̑1ѧ2
̑ѧн1
̑ѵ1
2̾
̾1е
̾1и
̾и́1
̾и1м
̾1н
̾не1
̾2с2
̾1ѡ1
̾1ѧ
̾1ѻ1
̾1ꙋ
̾ꙋ́2
̾ꙋ́м1
̾ꙋ1в
̾ꙋго1
̾ꙋмѣ1
а2̀
а2́
а́ва1
а́в1ц
а́г2
а́1гл
а́да1
2а́е
2а́ж
2а́з
а́з1в
а́1зр
а́к2
а́ка1
а́1кл
а́ла1
а́л1м
а́лꙋ1
а́м1в
а́м1л
1а́мь
а́мє1
а́мꙋ1
а́н1м
а́н1т
1а́ню
а́нѧ1
2а́1п
а́по1
а́р1в
а́р1г
а́с1н
а́с1п
2а́т
а́ти1
а́1тк
2а́х
а́1ц
а́чи1
2а́ш
а́ша1
а́щꙋ1
2а́ю
2а́ѧ
2а́2ѯ
а́1ѳ
а́ѵ1р
а2̑
а̑2б
а̑в1н
а̑ж2
1а̑2м1
1а̑нѧ
а̑1п2
а̑2р1
а̑с1н
а̑х1
а̑2ч1
а1а
аа́1н
аа̑2
а1б2
або1л
абы̑1
абѣ2
абꙋ́1
2ав
а1ва
ав1в
а2в1д
а1ве
а1ви
ав1лє
а2в1н
а1во1
аво́1
аврї1
аврї1
авше1
а1вы
а1вї1
а1вї1
а1вѡ
а1вѣ
а1вѵ
авѵ́1
авѷ1
авѷ1
а1вꙋ
авꙋ́1
а1г
а2г1г
агда1
1аге
а2г1к
2аго
аго́1
аго1р
агра1
агрѧ1
а1да
ада̑1
2а1де
ади1в
а1д2к
ад1но1
а1дны
а1до
а1ды
2адѐ
2адѐ
а1ді
а1дї1
а1дї1
2адѝ
2адѝ
2адѣ
2адѧ
а1дꙋ2
2а1е
ае́1ш
ае1д
аеди1
ае2к1
ае1с
аесѣ1
2а1ж2
аза2
азах1
а2з1в
2азд
азди1
аз1др
аз1ды
а1зе
а1зи
2а2з1л
а1зна
азо1р
2а2з1р
а1зы
азѡ1
а1зѣ
2а1з2ꙋ
2а1и
аи́1т
аи̑2
аи̑н1
аи1л
аи1м
аимо1
2а2й1
2а2й1
айшї1
айшї1
айшї1
айшї1
а1к
ака́1
ака̑1
аке1
аки1
акл2
ако1н
ако1р
1акі
акѡ1в
а1ла
ала1л
ала1м
ала1х
ал1д
а1ле
1ален1
а1ли
али̑1
али1н
1алле
аллї1
аллї1
ал1м
а1ло
а1лы
а1лю
алю́1
а1лі
а1лї1
а1лї1
а1лѝ
а1лѝ
а1лѡ
а1лѣ
а1лѧ
а1лꙋ2
а1ма
ама1р
1ам1в
а1ме1
1амер
а1ми
а1мо
амо1м
а2м1п
а2м1ч
2амъ
а1мы
а1мі
а1мї1
а1мї1
а1мѝ
а1мѝ
а1мѣ
амꙋ́1
2а1на
анас1
ан1д
а1не2
2а1ни
1анні
аннї1
аннї1
а1но
ано́1
ан1ц
2анъ
а1ны
а1ню2
а1нѐ
а1нѐ
1а1ні
ані́1
2анї1
2анї1
а1нѝ
а1нѝ
анѡ1н
а1нѣ
а1нѧ
а1нꙋ
анꙋ́1
1анꙋа
2а1п2
апе́1
апер1
апе1т
апи́1
апре1
апі́1
апї1
апї1
а1ра
ара1с
ар1в
ар1д
ардо1
2а1ре
аре1м
2а1ри
ар1к
аркї1
аркї1
ар1л
ар1м
а1ро
ар1с
ар1т
артї1
артї1
а1ры
2арь
а1рю
а1рѐ
а1рѐ
а1рє
арє1м
а1рі
арі́1
а1рї1
а1рї1
арїи1
арїи1
2а1рѝ
2а1рѝ
а1рѡ
1арѡ̑
а1рѣ
2а1рѧ
а1рѷ1
а1рѷ1
а1рꙋ2
а1са
а1се2
а1си
ас1ло
а2с1н
а1со
ас1па1
ас1пе
аспи1
ас1пѧ
ас1с
ассї1
ассї1
2аст
а1стѝ
а1стѝ
а1сы
а1сѐ
а1сѐ
а1сє
асє́1
асі́1
а1сѝ
а1сѝ
а1сѡ
а1сѣ
2асѧ1
2ат
а1та
ата́1
ата̑1
ата1в
ата1н
а1тв
а1те
ате́1
а1ти
ати1л
а1т2л
а1то
ато́1
а1тр
атрї1
атрї1
а1т2ч
а1ты
аты̑1
а1ті
аті́1
а1тї1
а1тї1
а1тѝ
а1тѝ
а1тѡ
а1тѣ
а1тѧ
а1тꙋ
атꙋ́1
2а1ф2
афа2
афї1
афї1
афѵ́1
2ах
аха́1
аха1л
а1хи
а1хо
а1х2т
ахі́1
ахѡ́1
ахꙋ1
а1ц
ацѣ2
а1ч
ачер1
аче1с
ач1н
ачꙋ2
а1ш
ашє́1
ашꙋ2
ашꙋ́1
а1щ2
аща́1
ащꙋ2
2а1ю
ающї1
ающї1
а1і
аі́1
а1ї1
а1ї1
аїа1
аїа1
2а1ѡ
аѡ1н
2а1ѧ
аѧ́1т
аѧ́ю1
аѯа́1
а1ѳ2
аѳа2
аѳо1
аѳі́1
а1ѵ́1
аѵ1р
аѵ1с
а҆́1б
а҆́л1
а҆́1м
а҆́н1
а҆а1
а҆дѡ1
а҆1з2
а҆к2
а҆кꙋ1
а҆ме1
а҆мо1
а҆ра1
а҆ѵ1
а2ⷡ
а2ⷤ
2аⷩ
а2ⷭ
а2ⷱ
а1ꙋ
аꙋ́1т
аꙋ́1ч
2б.
2б̾1
1ба
ба́1н
ба́1с
ба́1т
ба́1ч
ба́1ш
ба̑2
ба1в2
баг2
ба1н
2б1б
1б2ве
бве́1
2б1ви
бви́1
1б2вѐ
1б2вѐ
1б2вѝ
1б2вѝ
1бг
2б1де
б2ди
бди́1
1б2дѣ
1б2е
бе2з1
бе1р2
бет1
бе2х
1бж
1б2з
бза2
бза́1
бзꙋ́1
1б2и
би́1д
би́1н
би́1с
би́1ц
би̑1
била1
би2м
бин2
би1р
бис2
бити1
биша1
бл2
1бла
б1ла̀
1бле1в
1блег1
1блек
бле1м
б1лен
1бле1с
1бле1ц
1блеч
1блещ
1б2ли
1б2ло1
2блъ
2бль
1блю́
1блю1д
б1лющ
2б1лє
блєн1
1б2лї1
1б2лї1
1б2лѝ
1б2лѝ
1блѧ.
1блѧ̀
блѧ́1
1блѧ̑
1блѧг
1бл҃
1блꙋ
2б1м
2бн2
бна1
бне2
б1нем
б1нет
б1ни
б1нов
бно1м
б1ны.
бнї1
бнї1
б1нѣ.
б1нꙋ
1б2о
бо́1з
бо́1к
бо́1ц
бое2
бож2
бо1з2
бо1н
бо1р
бор1ц
бо1щ
бою́1
боѡ1
1бр2
б2ре
бре1м
бре1т
б2ро
бро1н
2бръ
б2ры
2брь
брє1
брї1
брї1
б2рѡ2
б2рѧ
брѧ́1
б2рꙋ
2б1с2
бско1
бсто1
2б1х
бхо́1
2бц
б1ца
б1цы
б1цꙋ
2бч
2б1ш
бша1
бшꙋ1
б2щ
1бща
бща́1
1бще
бще́1
1бщи
2бщн
1бщї2
1бщї2
2б2ъ
1бы
бы́1д
бы́1ш
бы̑1н
бы1м
2бь1
1бѐ
1бѐ
1бє
бє́2
бє́с1
1бі
бі́2
1бї1
1бї1
1бѝ
1бѝ
1бѡ
бѡ́1г
бѡ́р1
бѡ̑1
бѡ1л
1бѣ
бѣ́1ж
бѣ́1л
бѣ́1м
бѣ́1ш
бѣ1д
бѣдо1
бѣ1л
бѣ1т
бѣто1
1б2ѧ
бѧ́1х
бѧ2т
бѧще1
б҃2
1бꙋ
бꙋ́1д
бꙋ̑1
бꙋ2з1
бꙋ1р
в̾2
в2а
1ва́1г
ва́1д
1ва́е
ва́1ж
1ва́й
1ва́й
1ва́м
ва́1т
ва́1ш
1ва́ю
1ва́є1
1ва́ѧ
1ва̑1н
1ва̑р
ва̑1ш
1ва̑ю
1вав
1вагѡ
ва1д
1вае
1вай
1вай
1вак
вал2
1валъ
1вани
1ванн
1ванї
1ванї
1варс
1варъ
1вары
1варѝ
1варѝ
1варѡ
1варѧ
1вас
ва1ст
1ва1т
вати1
вах2
1вахо
1вахꙋ
1ваш
ваша1
ваше1
1ваю
вают1
1ваѡ
1ваѧ
2ваⷤ
2вв
в1ва
вва́1
в2ве
вве1д
ввер1
в1во.
вво́1
в1вы
в1вꙋ
2в1г
вго1
в1да́
в1да̑1
2вди
1вдо́
1вдою
1в2ді
в2дѡ
в2е
1ве́а
1ве́д
1ве́и
1ве́к
1ве́м
1ве́с
1ве́т
1ве́ц
ве́1ч
1ве́1ш
ве1в
1ведд
1веди
1вед1н
1ведо
1ведꙋ
ве2з1
1ве1л
веле1
1вена
1вене
1вени
1вен1т
1венц
венї1
венї1
1вера
1верз
1вери
веро1
1верш
1веръ
1верꙋ
1ве1с
1ве1т
1вецъ
1ве1ч
1вещ
в2ж
вжи1
1в2з2
вза1
взи1
взы́1
в2и
1ви́в
1ви́д
1ви́л
1ви́м
1ви́н
1ви́р
1ви́с
1ви́х
1ви́ц
1ви́1ч
1ви́ш
1ви̑
ви̑н1
1вив
2виг
2виж
2ви1з2
1вил
вила1
1вим
вима1
вимо1
1ви1н
ви1р
1вирї
1вирї
1вис
1вит
вити1
ви1ф
1вих
вице1
1вича
1вичю
1вичѣ
1вичꙋ
1виш
виша1
1вищ
в2к
вл2
1в2ла
вла1с
1влек
1вле1ц
1влеч
1влещ
2в1ли
в2ло1
2влъ
2вль
в1лю́1
в1лєн1
1в2лі
1в2лѣ
влѣ́1
в1лѧ.
влѧ́1
1в2м
вма́1
вмѣ1
вмѣ́1
в1на1
1вна̀
вне́1
1внег
в1нее
вне1м
в1ни.
в1ник
в1них
в1ниц
вно1
в1нов
в1нод
в1ном
2внш
2внъ
2в1ны
2в1ню1
2внї
2внї
2внѡ
1внѣ̀
2внѧ
в1нѧг
в1нꙋю
во́з1
1во́л
1во́н
1во́т
1во́ю
1воа
1вовѣ
1вог
1вода
1води
вод1н
1воды
1водѝ
1водѝ
1водѣ
1вое.
вое1м
вож2
1вожꙋ
воз1
1возб
1возв
1возг
1возм
1возн
возо1
1возс
1возш
2вои
1вой
1вой
1вок
1вол
1вомꙋ
1вон
вона1
1воп2
во1р
1воро
вор1ц
1вос
воси1
восо1
1вот2
воца1
1воч
воче1
во2ш1
2воѐ
2воѐ
2воє
2воѝ
2воѝ
1воѡ1
2воѧ
воѻ1
в2п2
впа1д
впе1
1в2р2
вра̑1
вра1з
вре1д
вре1м
вро2
вро́1
врꙋ1
2вс2
в2са
в2се
все1н
все1р
все1х
все1ц
всеѡ1
в2си
вска1
вскї1
вскї1
в2сп
в1ст2
в2сы1
в2сю
в2сѐ
в2сѐ
в2сѝ
в2сѝ
в2сѣ
всѧ́1
в2сꙋ
всꙋ́1
1в2т
вто1р
в2х2
вц2
в1ца.
1вца́
в1цы̀
2в1цє
1в2ча
1вче́
вче1р
2вчї1
2вчї1
2в1ш2
вша1
вшаѧ1
вше1м
вшꙋ1
2в2ъ
в2ы
1вы́
вы́1м
вы́1н
1вы̑
1вый
1вый
1вык
1выма
вы1с
1вы1ш2
2вь1
1вє́1л
1вє́н1
1вє́с
1вєд
вєн1
1ві
ві́1к
в2ї
в2ї
1вїа
1вїа
1вїй
1вїй
1вїй
1вїй
вї1к
вї1к
вї2л1
вї2л1
1вї1м
1вї1м
вї1н
вї1н
вї1с
вї1с
в2ѝ1
в2ѝ1
1вѡ.
1вѡ́1д
1вѡ́л
1вѡ́р
1вѡ́т
1вѡв
2вѡи
1вѡм
в2ѣ
1вѣ́д
1вѣ́е
1вѣ́ж
1вѣ́й
1вѣ́й
1вѣ́м
1вѣ́н
1вѣ́ц
вѣ́1ш
1вѣ̑д
1вѣ̑к
1вѣ̑с
1вѣ̑т
вѣ̑ч1
1вѣд2
1вѣе
2вѣ2з1
1вѣй
1вѣй
вѣко1
2вѣ1л
1вѣмъ
1вѣрѧ
1вѣс
2вѣт
вѣто1
1вѣх
1вѣщє
в2ѧ
1вѧ.
1вѧ̀
1вѧ́д1
1вѧ́1с
1вѧ́1х
1вѧ́ш
1вѧ́щ
1вѧд
вѧ1з
1вѧзе
1вѧтс
1вѧтъ
1вѧть
1вѧ1х
вѧ1ч
вѧче1
1вѧш
1вѧщи
1вѧщы
1вѧщї
1вѧщї
1вѵ́1л
1вѵ́п
вѵ́1т
1в2ѷ
1в2ѷ
вѷ2с1
вѷ2с1
в҃2
в҃и́1
в҃о1
в҃ы1
2вⷣ2
в2ꙋ
1вꙋ́.
1вꙋ́л
1вꙋ́р1
1вꙋ́т
1вꙋ́1щ
1вꙋ1д
вꙋе1м
1вꙋ1х
вꙋхо1
1вꙋю.
г2а
1га̀
1га́в
га́1г
1га́е
1га́й
1га́й
1га́л
1га́м
1га́н
1га́п
1га́т
1га́1х
1га́1ш
1га́ю
1га́ѳ
га̑1
1га̑т
гаа́1
га1в
1гаг
1га1д2
1гае
1гаж
1гай
1гай
га1л
га1м
гама1
2га1р
1га1с
1га1т
1гаѧ
1гаѳ
1г2в
1г2гі
2гг҃
г2д
1гда
гда́1
гда1л
1гдо2
гдо́1
2гдъ
1гдѣ
гдѣ́1
1ге
ге́р1
ге1д
геде1
гее2
ге2н1
гер1м
геѡ2
г2и
1ги.
1ги́б
1ги́з
ги́1н
1ги́1т
1ги̑2
ги̑з1
1гиб
1гим
1гис
1гих
гк2
2г1кв
1г2ко1
2г1кр
1г2кї
1г2кї
2гкѵ
гкѵ́1
1гла
гла1в
гла1с
1г2ле1
1г2ли
г1ло.
гло́1
1глот
2глс
2глъ
2г2лы
2гль
1г2лі
1г2лї1
1г2лї1
1г2лѡ
1г2лѣ
1г2лѧ
глѧ́1
г2лѷ1
г2лѷ1
2г2лꙋ
1г2м
гма́1
1г2на2
1гне́
1гнед
1гнез
г1нем
1гнен
1гнеп
1гнер
г1нет
1гнец
1гнеѡ1
г1ни.
1гни́1
1гниц
1г2но
2гн1ц
2гн1ч
2гнъ
2гнь
1г2ню2
1г2ні
1г2нї2
1г2нї2
1г2нѝ
1г2нѝ
1г2нѣ
1г2нѧ
г1нꙋ1т
1гнꙋш
1го.
1го̀
1го́.
1го́д
1го́1ж
го́1м
1го́1н
1го́р
1го́1с
1го́ф1
1го́х
1го́ш
1го́ю
1гоб2
гов2
1гова
1гови
1говм
1гогл
1гогр
1годи
1годо1
1годꙋ
1гое
1гож2
1го1з2
гоиз1
1гок
го1л
голꙋ1
1гом
1го1н2
гона1
гоп2
1гопи
1гопл
1гопо1
1гопѣ
1гори
1горо
1горч
1горї
1горї
1госв
1госѧ
госꙋ1
1гот
1гох2
1гоц
1гоча
гочє1
1гою
гоѡб1
1гоѡч
1гоѧ
гоѧв1
1гоѹ
1гоᲂу
1гоѻ1
гоꙋ1
1гоꙋв
1г2р2
гра̑1
гра1н
гре́1
гре1м
гро1м
грі́1
грї2
грї2
грѷ1
грѷ1
грꙋ1
2г1с
гст2
1г2т
2г1х
гха́1
1г2ц
2г1ч
2г1ш2
гша1
гше1
гшї1
гшї1
2г2ъ1
1гє
1гі́а
1гі́е
1гі́и
1гі́ю
1гі̑1
1г2ї
1г2ї
гї1г
гї1г
1гѝ
1гѝ
1гѡ
гѡ́д1
гѡ́1ж
гѡ́р1
гѡ1с
1гѣ
1гѵ
гѵ́1
г҃2
г҃о1
2гⷣ2
2гⷭ
1г2ꙋ
гꙋ́1
гꙋ̑1
гꙋб1л
гꙋ2т
гꙋю1
2д2̾1
д̾ѧв1
д̾ꙋ1
д2а
да́1г
да́1д
1да́й
1да́й
1да́к
1да́м
1да́р
да́1ш
да́є1
1да̑р
1да̑т
1дав
дав1л
1даг
1да1д
1дае
1дайт
1дайт
1дак
дако1
1дала
1дале
1далъ
1далї
1далї
да1м
1дама
1данъ
1данї
1данї
1да1р
даро1
1да1с2
1да1т
дати1
1дахꙋ
1даш
1даю
1даѧ
2д1б
дбѣ2
дв2
1два̀
два́1
два1н
д1ва1р
д2ве
две1р
1д2ви
д1воз
1двор
д2вє
двє́1
2двѣ
двѣ1м
1дв҃
д2вꙋ
2д1г2
дгла1
дгрѧ1
2д1д
д2е
1де́а
1де́б
1де́ж
1де́и
1де́1к
1де́р
1де́с
1де́т
1де́ц
1де́ч1
1де́1ш
1де́ю
1де́є
1де́ѡ
1деб
дебе1
1де1в
1деж
1дей
1дей
2де1л
1дем
1ден
1дер1
де1с
1деса
1десе
1десн
1десы
1десѐ
1десѐ
1десѝ
1десѝ
1десѣ
1десѧ
1дета
1дете
1де2х
1дец
2дею
1деѡ́
2д1з2
1д2и
ди́1с
ди́1щ
ди̑в1
ди̑1м
див1л
диво1
ди1л
дима1
димо1
ди1н
дино1
ди1р
дис2
ди1ф
1д2ка1
1дки
2д1кл
дкло1
1д2ко1
1дкї
1дкї
2дла
дла̑1
д1лаг
д1леж
1длен1
2д1ло1
д2лѧ
д2м
1дма
дма́1
1дме1
1дми
дми́1
1дмо2
дмо́1
1дмы
2дмь
1дмѝ
1дмѝ
дна1
д1на́1
д1нас
1дне́
1днеа
днев1
д1нем
1днес
1днеє
д1ни.
д1ни́
д1них
д1но́1
1днов
1днол
д1но1м
1днос
д1ноє
